test/src/gt-norm-yamls/V-saagastit_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

  Verb - ságastit: # Verb 'to speak'
     ságastit+V+Inf: ságastit

     ságastit+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: ságastav
     ságastit+V+Ind+Prs+Sg2: ságasta
     ságastit+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: [ságasta, ságast]
     ságastit+V+Ind+Prs+Du1: ságastin
     ságastit+V+Ind+Prs+Du2: ságastähppen #, ságastehpen]    #check!
     ságastit+V+Ind+Prs+Du3: ságasteba
     ságastit+V+Ind+Prs+Pl1: ságastip
     ságastit+V+Ind+Prs+Pl2: ságastihppit
     ságastit+V+Ind+Prs+Pl3: ságasti

     ságastit+V+Ind+Prt+Sg1: ságastiv
     ságastit+V+Ind+Prt+Sg2: ságasti
     ságastit+V+Ind+Prt+Sg3: ságastij
     ságastit+V+Ind+Prt+Du1: ságastijmen
     ságastit+V+Ind+Prt+Du2: ságastijden
     ságastit+V+Ind+Prt+Du3: ságastijga
     ságastit+V+Ind+Prt+Pl1: ságastijme
     ságastit+V+Ind+Prt+Pl2: ságastijde
     ságastit+V+Ind+Prt+Pl3: ságastin

     ságastit+V+Imprt+Sg2: ságaste  
     ságastit+V+Imprt+Du2: ságastehten    #check!
     ságastit+V+Imprt+Pl2: ságastihttit   #check!

     ságastit+V+ConNeg: ságaste
     ságastit+V+GerII: ságastemin
     ságastit+V+PrfPrc: ságastam
#     ságastit+V+GerI: ságastittijn 
#     ságastit+V+Sup: ságastitjit
#     ságastit+V+Vabe: ságastak  
#     ságastit+V+Vgen: ságasta 
#     ságastit+V+PrsPrc: ságastäddje 
#     ságastit+V+Vsubst: ságastim

#     ságastit+V+Pot+Sg1: ságastittjav
#     ságastit+V+Pot+Sg2: ságastittja
#     ságastit+V+Pot+Sg3: ságastitj
#     ságastit+V+Pot+Du1: ságastittjin
#     ságastit+V+Pot+Du2: [ságastittjabiehten, ságastittjabähtten]
#     ságastit+V+Pot+Du3: ságastittjaba
#     ságastit+V+Pot+Pl1: ságastittjap
#     ságastit+V+Pot+Pl2: ságastittjabihtit
#     ságastit+V+Pot+Pl3: ságastittji
